District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

44-631

Definitions.

Expired.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5012, 57 DCR 6242

Temporary Legislation

Section 1102 of D.C. Law 18-222 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 1102. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this act, the term:
“(1) ‘Hospital’ has the same meaning as set forth in section 2(a)(1) of the Health-Care and Community Residence Facility, Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of 1983, effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-48; D.C. Official Code § 44-501(a)(1)), but excludes St. Elizabeths Hospital and any hospital operated by the federal government.
“(2) ‘Medicaid’ means the medical assistance programs authorized by title XIX of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 343; 42 U.S.C.§ 1396 et seq.), and by section 1 of An Act To enable the District of Columbia to receive Federal financial assistance under title XIX of the Social Security Act for a medical assistance program, and for other purposes, approved December 27, 1967 (81 Stat. 744; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.02), and administered by the Department of Health Care Finance.”
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1102 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5012 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 1102 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).